Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB274.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 40 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Compensation" means any money, thing of value, or economic benefit
conferred on or received by any person in return for services rendered, or to
be rendered, by himself or herself or another;
(b) "Person" means any natural person, corporation, trust, partnership,
incorporated or unincorporated association, or any other legal entity; and
(c) "Veterans' benefits matter" means the preparation, presentation, or
prosecution of any claim affecting any person who has filed or expressed an
intent to file a claim for any benefit, program, service, commodity, function,
status, or entitlement to which is determined to pertain to veterans, their
dependents, their survivors, or any other individual eligible for the benefits
under the laws and regulations administered by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs or the Kentucky Department of Veterans'
Affairs.
(2) (a) A person shall not advise, assist, or consult any individual concerning any
veterans' benefits matter for compensation without clearly providing at the
outset of the business relationship the following disclosure both orally and
in writing:
"This business is not sponsored by or affiliated with the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs, the Kentucky Department of Veterans'
Affairs, or any other federally chartered veterans' service organization.
Other organizations, including but not limited to the Kentucky Department
of Veterans' Affairs, a local veterans' service organization, and other
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 11/4/2025 12:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 449
federally chartered veterans' service organizations may be able to provide
you with this service free of charge. Products or services offered by this
business are not necessarily endorsed by any of these organizations. You
may qualify for other veterans' benefits beyond the benefits for which you
are receiving services here."
(b) The written disclosure in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall appear in at
least twelve (12) point font and in a readily noticeable and identifiable place
in the person's agreement with the individual seeking services. The
individual shall verbally acknowledge understanding of the oral disclosure
and sign the document in which the written disclosure appears to represent
understanding of these provisions. The person offering services shall retain
a copy of the written disclosure while providing veterans' benefits services
for compensation to the individual and for at least one (1) year after the
date on which the service relations terminate.
(3) A violation of this section shall constitute an unfair, false, misleading, or
deceptive act or practice in the conduct of trade or commerce under KRS 367.170.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 11/4/2025 12:57 PM Jacketed